Missouri, session 2026, HB2462.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 566, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 566.146, to read as follows:
566.146. 1. Any person who has been found guilty of:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the provisions of section
568.020, incest; section 568.045, endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree;
section 573.200, use of a child in a sexual performance; section 573.205, promoting a
sexual performance by a child; section 573.023, sexual exploitation of a minor; section
573.025, promoting child pornography; section 573.037, possession of child
pornography; or section 573.040, furnishing pornographic material to minors; or
(2) Any offense in any other jurisdiction that, if committed in this state, would be
a violation listed in this section

shall not use or loiter within five hundred feet of any pool located at any apartment or
condominium complex regardless of whether the person resides at such apartment or
condominium complex. Beginning August 28, 2026, any person found guilty of any
offense under subsection 1 of this section shall not establish a residence in any
apartment or condominium complex containing a pool.
2. The first violation of the provisions of this section is a class E felony.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2462 2
3. A second or subsequent violation of this section is a class D felony.
✔